Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-203
Auctioneer's memorandum, how construed.

Whenever goods shall be sold at public auction, and the auctioneer shall, at the time of the sale, enter in a sale book a memorandum specifying the nature and price of the property sold, the terms of sale, the name of the purchaser, and the name of the person on whose account the sale is made, such memorandum shall be deemed a note of the contract of sale within the meaning of section 2-201, Uniform Commercial Code.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 69, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 2632;

C.S.1922, § 2460;

C.S.1929, § 36-204;

R.S.1943, § 36-203;

Laws 1972, LB 1056, § 1.